Washington statutes.
RCW 18.59.160

Purchase, storage, and administration of medications—Restrictions—Liability.

An occupational therapist licensed under this chapter may purchase, store, and administer topical and transdermal medications such as hydrocortisone, dexamethasone, fluocinonide, topical anesthetics, lidocaine, magnesium sulfate, and other similar medications for the practice of occupational therapy as prescribed by a health care provider with prescribing authority as authorized in RCW 18.59.100. Administration of medication must be documented in the patient's medical record. Some medications may be applied by the use of iontophoresis and phonophoresis. An occupational therapist may not purchase, store, or administer controlled substances. A pharmacist who dispenses such drugs to a licensed occupational therapist is not liable for any adverse reactions caused by any method of use by the occupational therapist. Application of a topical medication to a wound is subject to RCW 18.59.170.

[ 2011 c 88 s 2; 2009 c 68 s 1.]

NOTES:

Rules—2011 c 88: See note following RCW 18.59.170.